Wisconsin, session 2025, SB859.
do enact as follows:SB859,11Section 1. 71.01 (6) (n) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB859,2,6271.01 (6) (n) 1. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2022, and 3before January 1, 2026, for individuals and fiduciaries, except fiduciaries of nuclear 4decommissioning trust or reserve funds, “Internal Revenue Code” means the 5federal Internal Revenue Code as amended to December 31, 2022, except as 6provided in subds. 2. and 3. and s. 71.98, and subject to subd. 4.SB859,27Section 2. 71.01 (6) (o) of the statutes is created to read:SB859,2,12871.01 (6) (o) 1. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, for 9individuals and fiduciaries, except fiduciaries of nuclear decommissioning trust or 10reserve funds, “Internal Revenue Code” means the federal Internal Revenue Code 11as amended to December 31, 2025, except as provided in subds. 2. and 3. and s. 1271.98, and subject to subd. 4.SB859,3,9132. For purposes of this paragraph, “Internal Revenue Code” does not include 14the following provisions of federal public laws for taxable years beginning after 15December 31, 2025: section 422 of P.L. 108-357; section 1351 of P.L. 109-58; section 16403 (q) of P.L. 109-135; section 104 of P.L. 109-432; section 11 (e) and (g) of P.L. 110-17172; section 301 of P.L. 110-245; section 15351 of P.L. 110-246; section 801 of 18division C of P.L. 110-343; sections 211, 212, 213, and 214 of P.L. 111-226; section 192122 of P.L. 111-240; sections 322 and 323 of P.L. 112-240; section 1101 of P.L. 114-174; sections 128, 143, 144, 169, 326, and 411 of division Q of P.L. 114-113; sections 211011, 11012, 13201 (a) to (e) and (g), 13221, 13301, 13304 (a), (b), and (d), 13531, 314101, 14102, 14103, 14201, 14202, 14211, 14212, 14213, 14214, 14215, 14221, 414222, 14301, 14302, 14304, and 14401 of P.L. 115-97; sections 101 (d), 201 to 207, 5and 302 of division U of P.L. 115-141; section 145 of division Q of P.L. 116-94; 6sections 2304 and 2306 of P.L. 116-136; sections 111, 116, and 210 of division EE of 7P.L. 116-260; section 9041 of P.L. 117-2; section 13903 (b) of P.L. 117-169; and 8sections 70105, 70301, 70303, 70307, 70312, 70321, 70322, 70323, 70341, 70342, 970351, 70353, 70354, 70421, 70425, 70426, 70434, 70509, and 70601 of P.L. 119-21.SB859,3,13103. For purposes of this paragraph, “Internal Revenue Code” does not include 11amendments to the federal Internal Revenue Code, including provisions of federal 12public laws that directly or indirectly affect the Internal Revenue Code, enacted 13after December 31, 2025.SB859,4,21144. For purposes of this paragraph, the provisions of federal public laws that 15directly or indirectly affect the Internal Revenue Code, as defined in this 16paragraph, apply for Wisconsin purposes at the same time as for federal purposes, 17except changes made by sections 1, 3, 4, and 5 of P.L. 106-519; sections 101 and 102 18of P.L. 108-357; section 1310 of P.L. 109-58; section 11146 of P.L. 109-59; section 513 19of P.L. 109-222; sections 8233 and 8235 of P.L. 110-28; section 302 of division A, 20section 401 of division B, and sections 312, 322, 502 (c), and 707 of division C of P.L. 21110-343; sections 1232, 1251, 1501, and 1502 of division B of P.L. 111-5; section 216 22of P.L. 111-226; sections 753, 754, and 760 of P.L. 111-312; sections 104, 318, 326, 23327, and 411 of P.L. 112-240; sections 159 (a) and 221 of division A of P.L. 113-295; 24section 2 of P.L. 114-7; section 305 of division P and sections 123, 125, 126, 127, 151, 1152, 153, 165, 166, 167, 170, 171, 189, and 191 of division Q of P.L. 114-113; sections 213204, 13206, 13305 (a), 13601, and 13801 of P.L. 115-97; sections 40304, 40305, 340306, 40309, 40412, and 40414 of P.L. 115-123; section 101 (c) of division T of P.L. 4115-141; sections 101 (e), 102, 301, and 401 (a) (47) and (195), (b) (13), (17), (22) and 5(30), and (d) (1) (D) (v), (vi), (xiii) and (xvii) (II) and (4) (a) of division U of P.L. 115-6141; sections 101, 104, 114, 115, 116, 118, 130, 132, and 144 of division Q of P.L. 7116-94; section 2307 of division A of P.L. 116-136; sections 106, 114, 115, 118 (a) and 8(d), 133, 137, and 138 of division EE of P.L. 116-260; sections 5003, 9671, 9673, 9675 9and 9708 of P.L. 117-2; section 307 of division P of P.L. 117-103; section 4151 of 10division FF of P.L. 117-328; section 2 of P.L. 118-146; sections 2, 3, and 4 of P.L. 118-11148; section 2 of P.L. 118-167; sections 2, 3, 4, and 5 of P.L. 118-168; section 202 of 12P.L. 118-258; sections 70101, 70102, 70103, 70104, 70106, 70107, 70108, 70109, 1370110, 70111, 70112, 70113, 70114, 70115, 70116, 70117, 70118, 70119, 70120, 1470201, 70202, 70203, 70204, 70302, 70304, 70305, 70306, 70308, 70309, 70311, 1570313, 70331, 70352, 70401, 70402, 70403, 70404, 70405, 70411, 70412, 70413, 1670414, 70415, 70416, 70422, 70423, 70424, 70427, 70428, 70429, 70430, 70431, 1770432, 70433, 70435, 70436, 70437, 70438, 70439, 70501, 70502, 70503, 70504, 1870505, 70506, 70507, 70508, 70510, 70511, 70512, 70513, 70514, 70515, 70521, 1970522, 70523, 70524, 70525, 70602, 70603, 70604, 70605, 70606, 70607, 71301, 2071302, 71303, 71304, 71305, 71306, 71307, and 71308 of P.L. 119-21; and section 2 21of P.L. 119-29 apply for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.SB859,322Section 3. 71.05 (21m) of the statutes is created to read:SB859,5,72371.05 (21m) Differences in statutes. Except as otherwise provided in this 24subchapter, to prevent the double inclusion or omission of any item of income, loss, 1deduction, or basis, an addition or subtraction to income, as appropriate, shall be 2made equal to the difference in income for the taxable year due to state and federal 3differences, including differences arising from the difference in basis of assets 4disposed of in a transaction in which gain or loss is recognized for state tax 5purposes, different depreciation methods or difference in basis of depreciable 6assets, different elections, or transitional adjustments due to differences in the 7statutes.SB859,48Section 4. 71.07 (5) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB859,5,11971.07 (5) (a) (intro.) Add the amounts allowed as itemized deductions under 10the internal revenue code Internal Revenue Code without regard to section 68 of 11the Internal Revenue Code, except:SB859,512Section 5. 71.07 (5) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB859,5,141371.07 (5) (a) 2. Taxes under section 164 or 216 (a) (1) of the internal revenue 14code Internal Revenue Code.SB859,615Section 6. 71.07 (5) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB859,5,191671.07 (5) (a) 3. Casualty and theft deductions under section 165 (c) (3) of the 17internal revenue code Internal Revenue Code, except for casualty losses that are 18directly related to a presidentially declared disaster under 26 USC 7508A or a state 19declared disaster under section 165 (h) (5) of the Internal Revenue Code.SB859,720Section 7. 71.07 (5) (a) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB859,5,222171.07 (5) (a) 4. Expenses to move from this state under section 217 of the 22internal revenue code Internal Revenue Code.SB859,823Section 8. 71.22 (4) (n) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB859,6,42471.22 (4) (n) 1. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2022, and 1before January 1, 2026, “Internal Revenue Code” means the federal Internal 2Revenue Code as amended to December 31, 2022, except as provided in subds. 2. 3and 3. and subject to subd. 4., and except as provided in sub. (4m) and ss. 71.26 (2) 4(b) and (3), 71.34 (1g), 71.42 (2), and 71.98.SB859,95Section 9. 71.22 (4) (o) of the statutes is created to read:SB859,6,10671.22 (4) (o) 1. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, 7“Internal Revenue Code” means the federal Internal Revenue Code as amended to 8December 31, 2025, except as provided in subds. 2. and 3., and subject to subd. 4., 9and except as provided in sub. (4m) and ss. 71.26 (2) (b) and (3), 71.34 (1g), 71.42 (2), 10and 71.98.SB859,7,2112. For purposes of this paragraph, “Internal Revenue Code” does not include 12the following provisions of federal public laws for taxable years beginning after 13December 31, 2025: section 422 of P.L. 108-357; section 1351 of P.L. 109-58; section 14403 (q) of P.L. 109-135; section 104 of P.L. 109-432; section 11 (e) and (g) of P.L. 110-15172; section 301 of P.L. 110-245; section 15351 of P.L. 110-246; section 801 of 16division C of P.L. 110-343; sections 211, 212, 213, and 214 of P.L. 111-226; section 172122 of P.L. 111-240; sections 322 and 323 of P.L. 112-240; section 1101 of P.L. 114-1874; sections 128, 143, 144, 169, 326, and 411 of division Q of P.L. 114-113; sections 1911011, 11012, 13201 (a) to (e) and (g), 13221, 13301, 13304 (a), (b), and (d), 13531, 2014101, 14102, 14103, 14201, 14202, 14211, 14212, 14213, 14214, 14215, 14221, 2114222, 14301, 14302, 14304, and 14401 of P.L. 115-97; sections 101 (d) 201 to 207, 22and 302 of division U of P.L. 115-141; section 145 of division Q of P.L. 116-94; 23sections 2304 and 2306 of P.L. 116-136; sections 111, 116, and 210 of division EE of 24P.L. 116-260; section 9041 of P.L. 117-2; section 13903 (b) of P.L. 117-169; and 1sections 70105, 70301, 70303, 70307, 70312, 70321, 70322, 70323, 70341, 70342, 270351, 70353, 70354, 70421, 70425, 70426, 70434, 70509, and 70601 of P.L. 119-21.SB859,7,633. For purposes of this paragraph, “Internal Revenue Code” does not include 4amendments to the federal Internal Revenue Code, including provisions of federal 5public laws that directly or indirectly affect the Internal Revenue Code, enacted 6after December 31, 2025.SB859,8,1474. For purposes of this paragraph, the provisions of federal public laws that 8directly or indirectly affect the Internal Revenue Code, as defined in this 9paragraph, apply for Wisconsin purposes at the same time as for federal purposes, 10except changes made by sections 1, 3, 4, and 5 of P.L. 106-519; sections 101 and 102 11of P.L. 108-357; section 1310 of P.L. 109-58; section 11146 of P.L. 109-59; section 513 12of P.L. 109-222; sections 8233 and 8235 of P.L. 110-28; section 302 of division A, 13section 401 of division B, and sections 312, 322, 502 (c), and 707 of division C of P.L. 14110-343; sections 1232, 1251, 1501, and 1502 of division B of P.L. 111-5; section 216 15of P.L. 111-226; sections 753, 754, and 760 of P.L. 111-312; sections 104, 318, 326, 16327, and 411 of P.L. 112-240; sections 159 (a) and 221 of division A of P.L. 113-295; 17section 2 of P.L. 114-7; section 305 of division P and sections 123, 125, 126, 127, 151, 18152, 153, 165, 166, 167, 170, 171, 189, and 191 of division Q of P.L. 114-113; sections 1913204, 13206, 13305 (a), 13601, and 13801 of P.L. 115-97; sections 40304, 40305, 2040306, 40309, 40412, and 40414 of P.L. 115-123; section 101 (c) of division T of P.L. 21115-141; sections 101 (e), 102, 301, and 401 (a) (47) and (195), (b) (13), (17), (22), and 22(30), and (d) (1) (D) (v), (vi), (xiii), and (xvii) (II) and (4) (a) of division U of P.L. 115-23141; sections 101, 104, 114, 115, 116, 118, 130, 132, and 144 of division Q of P.L. 24116-94; section 2307 of division A of P.L. 116-136; sections 106, 114, 115, 118 (a) and 1(d), 133, 137, and 138 of division EE of P.L. 116-260; sections 5003, 9671, 9673, 29675, and 9708 of P.L. 117-2; section 307 of division P of P.L. 117-103; section 4151 3of division FF of P.L. 117-328; section 2 of P.L. 118-146; sections 2, 3, and 4 of P.L. 4118-148; section 2 of P.L. 118-167; sections 2, 3, 4, and 5 of P.L. 118-168; section 202 5of P.L. 118-258; sections 70101, 70102, 70103, 70104, 70106, 70107, 70108, 70109, 670110, 70111, 70112, 70113, 70114, 70115, 70116, 70117, 70118, 70119, 70120, 770201, 70202, 70203, 70204, 70302, 70304, 70305, 70306, 70308, 70309, 70311, 870313, 70331, 70352, 70401, 70402, 70403, 70404, 70405, 70411, 70412, 70413, 970414, 70415, 70416, 70422, 70423, 70424, 70427, 70428, 70429, 70430, 70431, 1070432, 70433, 70435, 70436, 70437, 70438, 70439, 70501, 70502, 70503, 70504, 1170505, 70506, 70507, 70508, 70510, 70511, 70512, 70513, 70514, 70515, 70521, 1270522, 70523, 70524, 70525, 70602, 70603, 70604, 70605, 70606, 70607, 71301, 1371302, 71303, 71304, 71305, 71306, 71307, and 71308 of P.L. 119-21; and section 2 14of P.L. 119-29 apply for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.SB859,1015Section 10. 71.22 (4m) (n) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB859,8,201671.22 (4m) (n) 1. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2022, and 17before January 1, 2026, “Internal Revenue Code,” for corporations that are subject 18to a tax on unrelated business income under s. 71.26 (1) (a), means the federal 19Internal Revenue Code as amended to December 31, 2022, except as provided in 20subds. 2. and 3. and s. 71.98, and subject to subd. 4.SB859,1121Section 11. 71.22 (4m) (o) of the statutes is created to read:SB859,9,22271.22 (4m) (o) 1. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, 23“Internal Revenue Code,” for corporations that are subject to a tax on unrelated 24business income under s. 71.26 (1) (a), means the federal Internal Revenue Code as 1amended to December 31, 2025, except as provided in subds. 2. and 3. and s. 71.98, 2and subject to subd. 4.SB859,9,1832. For purposes of this paragraph, “Internal Revenue Code” does not include 4the following provisions of federal public laws for taxable years beginning after 5December 31, 2025: section 422 of P.L. 108-357; section 1351 of P.L. 109-58; section 6403 (q) of P.L. 109-135; section 104 of P.L. 109-432; section 11 (e) and (g) of P.L. 110-7172; section 301 of P.L. 110-245; section 15351 of P.L. 110-246; section 801 of 8division C of P.L. 110-343; sections 211, 212, 213, and 214 of P.L. 111-226; section 92122 of P.L. 111-240; sections 322 and 323 of P.L. 112-240; section 1101 of P.L. 114-1074; sections 128, 143, 144, 169, 326, and 411 of division Q of P.L. 114-113; sections 1111011, 11012, 13201 (a) to (e) and (g), 13221, 13301, 13304 (a), (b), and (d), 13531, 1214101, 14102, 14103, 14201, 14202, 14211, 14212, 14213, 14214, 14215, 14221, 1314222, 14301, 14302, 14304, and 14401 of P.L. 115-97; sections 101 (d) 201 to 207, 14and 302 of division U of P.L. 115-141; section 145 of division Q of P.L. 116-94; 15sections 2304 and 2306 of P.L. 116-136; sections 111, 116, and 210 of division EE of 16P.L. 116-260; section 9041 of P.L. 117-2; section 13903 (b) of P.L. 117-169; and 17sections 70105, 70301, 70303, 70307, 70312, 70321, 70322, 70323, 70341, 70342, 1870351, 70353, 70354, 70421, 70425, 70426, 70434, 70509, and 70601 of P.L. 119-21.SB859,9,22193. For purposes of this paragraph, “Internal Revenue Code” does not include 20amendments to the federal Internal Revenue Code, including provisions of federal 21public laws that directly or indirectly affect the Internal Revenue Code, enacted 22after December 31, 2025.SB859,9,24234. For purposes of this paragraph, the provisions of federal public laws that 24directly or indirectly affect the Internal Revenue Code, as defined in this 1paragraph, apply for Wisconsin purposes at the same time as for federal purposes, 2except changes made by sections 1, 3, 4, and 5 of P.L. 106-519; sections 101 and 102 3of P.L. 108-357; section 1310 of P.L. 109-58; section 11146 of P.L. 109-59; section 513 4of P.L. 109-222; sections 8233 and 8235 of P.L. 110-28; section 302 of division A, 5section 401 of division B, and sections 312, 322, 502 (c), and 707 of division C of P.L. 6110-343; sections 1232, 1251, 1501, and 1502 of division B of P.L. 111-5; section 216 7of P.L. 111-226; sections 753, 754, and 760 of P.L. 111-312; sections 104, 318, 326, 8327, and 411 of P.L. 112-240; sections 159 (a) and 221 of division A of P.L. 113-295; 9section 2 of P.L. 114-7; section 305 of division P and sections 123, 125, 126, 127, 151, 10152, 153, 165, 166, 167, 170, 171, 189, and 191 of division Q of P.L. 114-113; sections 1113204, 13206, 13305 (a), 13601, and 13801 of P.L. 115-97; sections 40304, 40305, 1240306, 40309, 40412, and 40414 of P.L. 115-123; section 101 (c) of division T of P.L. 13115-141; sections 101 (e), 102, 301, and 401 (a) (47) and (195), (b) (13), (17), (22), and 14(30), and (d) (1) (D) (v), (vi), (xiii), and (xvii) (II) and (4) (a) of division U of P.L. 115-15141; sections 101, 104, 114, 115, 116, 118, 130, 132, and 144 of division Q of P.L. 16116-94; section 2307 of division A of P.L. 116-136; sections 106, 114, 115, 118 (a) and 17(d), 133, 137, and 138 of division EE of P.L. 116-260; sections 5003, 9671, 9673, 189675, and 9708 of P.L. 117-2; section 307 of division P of P.L. 117-103; section 4151 19of division FF of P.L. 117-328; section 2 of P.L. 118-146; sections 2, 3, and 4 of P.L. 20118-148; section 2 of P.L. 118-167; sections 2, 3, 4, and 5 of P.L. 118-168; section 202 21of P.L. 118-258; sections 70101, 70102, 70103, 70104, 70106, 70107, 70108, 70109, 2270110, 70111, 70112, 70113, 70114, 70115, 70116, 70117, 70118, 70119, 70120, 2370201, 70202, 70203, 70204, 70302, 70304, 70305, 70306, 70308, 70309, 70311, 2470313, 70331, 70352, 70401, 70402, 70403, 70404, 70405, 70411, 70412, 70413, 170414, 70415, 70416, 70422, 70423, 70424, 70427, 70428, 70429, 70430, 70431, 270432, 70433, 70435, 70436, 70437, 70438, 70439, 70501, 70502, 70503, 70504, 370505, 70506, 70507, 70508, 70510, 70511, 70512, 70513, 70514, 70515, 70521, 470522, 70523, 70524, 70525, 70602, 70603, 70604, 70605, 70606, 70607, 71301, 571302, 71303, 71304, 71305, 71306, 71307, and 71308 of P.L. 119-21; and section 2 6of P.L. 119-29 apply for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.SB859,127Section 12. 71.26 (2) (a) 13. of the statutes is created to read:SB859,11,15871.26 (2) (a) 13. Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, to prevent 9the double inclusion or omission of any item of income, loss, deduction, or basis, 10plus or minus, as appropriate, an amount equal to the difference in income for the 11taxable year due to state and federal differences, including differences arising from 12the difference in basis of assets disposed of in a transaction in which gain or loss is 13recognized for state tax purposes, different depreciation methods or difference in 14basis of depreciable assets, different elections, or transitional adjustments due to 15differences in the statutes.SB859,1316Section 13. 71.26 (2) (b) 15. a. of the statutes is amended to read:SB859,12,21771.26 (2) (b) 15. a. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2022, and 18before January 1, 2026, for a corporation, conduit, or common law trust that 19qualifies as a regulated investment company, real estate mortgage investment 20conduit, real estate investment trust, or financial asset securitization investment 21trust under the Internal Revenue Code, “net income” means the federal regulated 22investment company taxable income, federal real estate mortgage investment 23conduit taxable income, federal real estate investment trust, or financial asset 1securitization investment trust taxable income of the corporation, conduit, or trust 2as determined under the Internal Revenue Code.SB859,143Section 14. 71.26 (2) (b) 16. of the statutes is created to read:SB859,12,12471.26 (2) (b) 16. a. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, for a 5corporation, conduit, or common law trust that qualifies as a regulated investment 6company, real estate mortgage investment conduit, real estate investment trust, or 7financial asset securitization investment trust under the Internal Revenue Code, 8“net income” means the federal regulated investment company taxable income, 9federal real estate mortgage investment conduit taxable income, federal real estate 10investment trust, or financial asset securitization investment trust taxable income 11of the corporation, conduit, or trust as determined under the Internal Revenue 12Code.SB859,12,1513b. For purposes of subd. 16. a., “Internal Revenue Code” means the federal 14Internal Revenue Code as amended to December 31, 2025, except as provided in 15subd. 16. c. and d. and s. 71.98, and subject to subd. 16. e.SB859,13,716c. For purposes of subd. 16. a., “Internal Revenue Code” does not include the 17following provisions of federal public laws for taxable years beginning after 18December 31, 2025: section 422 of P.L. 108-357; section 1351 of P.L. 109-58; section 19403 (q) of P.L. 109-135; section 104 of P.L. 109-432; section 11 (e) and (g) of P.L. 110-20172; section 301 of P.L. 110-245; section 15351 of P.L. 110-246; section 801 of 21division C of P.L. 110-343; sections 211, 212, 213, and 214 of P.L. 111-226; section 222122 of P.L. 111-240; sections 322 and 323 of P.L. 112-240; section 1101 of P.L. 114-2374; sections 128, 143, 144, 169, 326, and 411 of division Q of P.L. 114-113; sections 2411011, 11012, 13201 (a) to (e) and (g), 13221, 13301, 13304 (a), (b), and (d), 13531, 114101, 14102, 14103, 14201, 14202, 14211, 14212, 14213, 14214, 14215, 14221, 214222, 14301, 14302, 14304, and 14401 of P.L. 115-97; sections 101 (d) 201 to 207, 3and 302 of division U of P.L. 115-141; section 145 of division Q of P.L. 116-94; 4sections 2304 and 2306 of P.L. 116-136; sections 111, 116, and 210 of division EE of 5P.L. 116-260; section 9041 of P.L. 117-2; section 13903 (b) of P.L. 117-169; and 6sections 70105, 70301, 70303, 70307, 70312, 70321, 70322, 70323, 70341, 70342, 770351, 70353, 70354, 70421, 70425, 70426, 70434, 70509, and 70601 of P.L. 119-21.SB859,13,108d. For purposes of subd. 16. a., “Internal Revenue Code” does not include 9amendments to the federal Internal Revenue Code enacted after December 31, 102025.SB859,14,1811e. For purposes of subd. 16. a., the provisions of federal public laws that 12directly or indirectly affect the Internal Revenue Code, as defined in this 13subdivision, apply for Wisconsin purposes at the same time as for federal purposes, 14except changes made by sections 1, 3, 4, and 5 of P.L. 106-519; sections 101 and 102 15of P.L. 108-357; section 1310 of P.L. 109-58; section 11146 of P.L. 109-59; section 513 16of P.L. 109-222; sections 8233 and 8235 of P.L. 110-28; section 302 of division A, 17section 401 of division B, and sections 312, 322, 502 (c), and 707 of division C of P.L. 18110-343; sections 1232, 1251, 1501, and 1502 of division B of P.L. 111-5; section 216 19of P.L. 111-226; sections 753, 754, and 760 of P.L. 111-312; sections 104, 318, 326, 20327, and 411 of P.L. 112-240; sections 159 (a) and 221 of division A of P.L. 113-295; 21section 2 of P.L. 114-7; section 305 of division P and sections 123, 125, 126, 127, 151, 22152, 153, 165, 166, 167, 170, 171, 189, and 191 of division Q of P.L. 114-113; sections 2313204, 13206, 13305 (a), 13601, and 13801 of P.L. 115-97; sections 40304, 40305, 2440306, 40309, 40412, and 40414 of P.L. 115-123; section 101 (c) of division T of P.L. 1115-141; sections 101 (e), 102, 301, and 401 (a) (47) and (195), (b) (13), (17), (22), and 2(30), and (d) (1) (D) (v), (vi), (xiii), and (xvii) (II) and (4) (a) of division U of P.L. 115-3141; sections 101, 104, 114, 115, 116, 118, 130, 132, and 144 of division Q of P.L. 4116-94; section 2307 of division A of P.L. 116-136; sections 106, 114, 115, 118 (a) and 5(d), 133, 137, and 138 of division EE of P.L. 116-260; sections 5003, 9671, 9673, 69675, and 9708 of P.L. 117-2; section 307 of division P of P.L. 117-103; section 4151 7of division FF of P.L. 117-328; section 2 of P.L. 118-146; sections 2, 3, and 4 of P.L. 8118-148; section 2 of P.L. 118-167; sections 2, 3, 4, and 5 of P.L. 118-168; section 202 9of P.L. 118-258; sections 70101, 70102, 70103, 70104, 70106, 70107, 70108, 70109, 1070110, 70111, 70112, 70113, 70114, 70115, 70116, 70117, 70118, 70119, 70120, 1170201, 70202, 70203, 70204, 70302, 70304, 70305, 70306, 70308, 70309, 70311, 1270313, 70331, 70352, 70401, 70402, 70403, 70404, 70405, 70411, 70412, 70413, 1370414, 70415, 70416, 70422, 70423, 70424, 70427, 70428, 70429, 70430, 70431, 1470432, 70433, 70435, 70436, 70437, 70438, 70439, 70501, 70502, 70503, 70504, 1570505, 70506, 70507, 70508, 70510, 70511, 70512, 70513, 70514, 70515, 70521, 1670522, 70523, 70524, 70525, 70602, 70603, 70604, 70605, 70606, 70607, 71301, 1771302, 71303, 71304, 71305, 71306, 71307, and 71308 of P.L. 119-21; and section 2 18of P.L. 119-29 apply for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.SB859,1519Section 15. 71.26 (3) (e) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB859,15,22071.26 (3) (e) 1. So that payments for wages, salaries, commissions and 21bonuses of employees and officers may be deducted only if the name, address and 22amount paid to each resident of this state to whom compensation of $600 or more 23that equals or exceeds the dollar amount in effect for the calendar year under 24section 6041 (a) of the Internal Revenue Code has been paid during the taxable year 1is reported or if the department of revenue is satisfied that failure to report has 2resulted in no revenue loss to this state.SB859,163Section 16. 71.34 (1g) (n) 1. of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb859 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb859 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB859 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB859 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB859: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting